Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2 UNIFORM DEBT-MANAGEMENT SERVICES ACT
5-19-218. Communication by electronic or other means - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Consumer" means an individual who seeks or obtains goods or services that are used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

"Federal act" means the federal "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq., as amended.

The names of its principal officers.

A provider may satisfy the requirements of section 5-19-217, 5-19-219, or 5-19-227 by means of the internet or other electronic means if the provider obtains a consumer's consent in the manner provided by section 101 (c) (1) of the federal act.

The disclosures and materials required by sections 5-19-217, 5-19-219, and 5-19-227 shall be presented in a form that is capable of being accurately reproduced for later reference.

With respect to disclosure by means of an internet website, the disclosure of the information required by section 5-19-217 (d) shall appear on one or more screens that:

(1) Contain no other information; and

(2) The individual must see before proceeding to assent to formation of a plan.

At the time of providing the materials and agreement required by sections 5-19-217 (c) and (d), 5-19-219, and 5-19-227, a provider shall inform the individual that upon electronic, telephonic, or written request, it will send the individual a written copy of the materials, and shall comply with a request as provided in subsection (f) of this section.

If a provider is requested, before the expiration of ninety days after a plan is completed or terminated, to send a written copy of the materials required by section 5-19-217 (c) and (d), 5-19-219, or 5-19-227, the provider shall send them at no charge within three business days after the request, but the provider need not comply with a request more than once per calendar month or if it reasonably believes the request is made for purposes of harassment. If a request is made more than ninety days after a plan is completed or terminated, the provider shall send within a reasonable time a written copy of the materials requested.

A provider that maintains an internet website shall disclose on the home page of its website or on a page that is clearly and conspicuously connected to the home page by a link that clearly reveals its contents:

(1) Its name and all names under which it does business;

(2) Its principal business address, telephone number, and electronic mail address, if any; and

Subject to subsection (i) of this section, if a consumer who has consented to electronic communication in the manner provided by section 101 of the federal act withdraws consent as provided in the federal act, a provider may terminate its agreement with the consumer.

If a provider wishes to terminate an agreement with a consumer pursuant to subsection (h) of this section, it shall notify the consumer that it will terminate the agreement unless the consumer, within thirty days after receiving the notification, consents to electronic communication in the manner provided in section 101 (c) of the federal act. If the consumer consents, the provider may terminate the agreement only as permitted by section 5-19-219 (a)(6)(H).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1152, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-218 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-219. Form and contents of agreement.

An agreement shall:

Be in a record;

Be dated and signed by the provider and the individual;

Include the name of the individual and the address where the individual resides;

Include the name, business address, and telephone number of the provider;

Be delivered to the individual immediately upon formation of the agreement; and

Disclose:

The services to be provided;

In a clear and conspicuous manner, the amount, percentage, or method of determining the amount, of all fees, individually itemized, to be paid by the individual, using only the terminology contained in section 5-19-223;

The schedule of payments to be made by or on behalf of the individual, including the amount of each payment, the date on which each payment is due, an estimate of the date of the final payment, and an estimate of the total of all payments to be made under the plan;

In a clear and conspicuous manner, the following information:

The amount of time necessary to achieve the represented results;

If the plan includes a settlement offer to any of the individual's creditors or debt collectors, the time by which the provider will make a bona fide settlement offer to each of them and the amount of money or the percentage of each outstanding debt that the individual must accumulate before the provider will make a bona fide settlement offer to each of them; and

If the provider requests or requires the individual to place funds in an account at an insured financial institution, that the individual owns the funds held in the account, the individual may withdraw from the plan at any time without penalty, and, if the individual withdraws, the individual must receive all funds in the account, other than funds earned by the provider in compliance with section 5-19-222 (h);

(E) If a plan provides for regular periodic payments to creditors:

Each creditor of the individual to which payment will be made, the amount owed to each creditor, and any concessions the provider reasonably believes each creditor will offer; and

The schedule of expected payments to each creditor, including the amount of each payment and the date on which it will be made;

(F) If the provider holds money on behalf of the individual, each creditor that the provider believes will not participate in the plan and to which the provider will not direct payment;

(G) How the provider will comply with its obligations under section 5-19-227 (a);

(H) If the provider holds money on behalf of the individual, that the provider may terminate the agreement for good cause, upon return of unexpended money of the individual;

That the individual may cancel the agreement as provided in section 5-19-220;

(J) That the individual may contact the administrator with any questions or complaints regarding the provider; and

(K) The address, telephone number, and internet address or website of the administrator.

For purposes of subsection (a)(5) of this section, delivery of an electronic record occurs when it is made available in a format in which the individual may retrieve, save, and print it, and the individual is notified that it is available.

If the administrator supplies the provider with any information required under subsection (a)(6)(K) of this section, the provider may comply with that requirement only by disclosing the information supplied by the administrator.

An agreement shall provide that:

(1) The individual has a right to terminate the agreement at any time, without penalty or obligation, by giving the provider written or electronic notice, in which event:

The provider will refund all unexpended money that the provider or its agent has received from or on behalf of the individual for the reduction or satisfaction of the individual's debt; and

All powers of attorney granted by the individual to the provider are revoked and ineffective;

(2) The individual authorizes any bank in which the provider or its agent has established a trust account to disclose to the administrator any financial records relating to the trust account; and

(3) The provider will notify the individual within five days after learning of a creditor's decision to reject or withdraw from a plan and that this notice will include:

(A) The identity of the creditor; and

(B) The right of the individual to modify or terminate the agreement.

An agreement may not:

(1) Provide for application of the law of any jurisdiction other than the United States and this state;

(2) Except as permitted by the uniform arbitration act, part 2 of article 22 of title 13, contain a provision that modifies or limits otherwise available forums or procedural rights, including the right to trial by jury, that are generally available to the individual under law other than this part 2;

(3) Contain a provision that restricts the individual's remedies under this part 2 or law other than this part 2; or

(4) Contain a provision that:

(A) Limits or releases the liability of any person for not performing the agreement or for violating this part 2; or

(B) Indemnifies any person for liability arising under the agreement or this part 2.

All rights and obligations specified in subsection (d) of this section and section 5-19-220 exist even if not provided in the agreement. A provision in an agreement that violates subsection (d), (e), or (f) of this section is void.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1153, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-219 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-220. Cancellation of agreement - waiver.

An individual may cancel an agreement before midnight of the third business day after the individual assents to it, unless the agreement does not comply with subsection (b) of this section or section 5-19-219 or 5-19-228, in which event the individual may cancel the agreement within thirty days after the individual assents to it. To exercise the right to cancel, the individual shall give notice in a record to the provider. Notice by mail is given when mailed.

An agreement shall be accompanied by a separate form that contains in bold-faced type, surrounded by bold black lines:

If a personal financial emergency necessitates the disbursement of an individual's money to one or more of the individual's creditors before the expiration of three days after an agreement is signed, an individual may waive the right to cancel. To waive the right, the individual shall send or deliver a signed, dated statement in the individual's own words describing the circumstances that necessitate a waiver. The waiver shall explicitly waive the right to cancel. A waiver by means of a standard form record is void.

Notice of Right to Cancel

You may cancel this agreement, without any penalty or obligation, at any time before midnight of the third business day that begins the day after you agree to it by electronic communication or by signing it.
To cancel this agreement during this period, send an e-mail to

(E-mail address of provider)

or mail or deliver a signed, dated copy of this notice, or any other written notice to

(Name of provider)

at

(Address of provider)

before midnight on

(Date)

.
If you cancel this agreement within the 3-day period, we will refund all money you already have paid us.
You also may terminate this agreement at any later time, but we are not required to refund fees you have paid us.
I cancel this agreement,

Print your name

Signature

Date

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1156, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-220 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-221. Required language.

Unless the administrator, by rule, provides otherwise, the disclosures and documents required by this part 2 shall be in English. If a provider communicates with an individual primarily in a language other than English, the provider shall furnish a translation into the other language of the disclosures and documents required by this part 2.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1157, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-221 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-222. Trust account.

All money paid to a provider by or on behalf of an individual pursuant to a plan for distribution to creditors is held in trust. Within two business days after receipt, the provider shall deposit the money in a trust account established for the benefit of individuals to whom the provider is furnishing debt-management services.

Money held in trust by a provider is not property of the provider or its designee. The money is not available to creditors of the provider or designee, except an individual from whom or on whose behalf the provider received money, to the extent that the money has not been disbursed to creditors of the individual.

A provider shall:

Maintain separate records of account for each individual to whom the provider is furnishing debt-management services;

Disburse money paid by or on behalf of the individual to creditors of the individual as disclosed in the agreement; except that:

The provider may delay payment to the extent that a payment by the individual is not final; and

If a plan provides for regular periodic payments to creditors, the disbursement shall comply with the due dates established by each creditor; and

Promptly correct any payments that are not made or that are misdirected as a result of an error by the provider or other person in control of the trust account and reimburse the individual for any costs or fees imposed by a creditor as a result of the failure to pay or misdirection.

A provider may not commingle money in a trust account established for the benefit of individuals to whom the provider is furnishing debt-management services with money of other persons.

A trust account shall at all times have a cash balance equal to the sum of the balances of each individual's account.

If a provider has established a trust account pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the provider shall reconcile the trust account at least once a month. The reconciliation shall compare the cash balance in the trust account with the sum of the balances in each individual's account. If the provider or its designee has more than one trust account, each trust account shall be individually reconciled.

If a provider discovers, or has a reasonable suspicion of, embezzlement or other unlawful appropriation of money held in trust, the provider immediately shall notify the administrator by a method approved by the administrator. Unless the administrator by rule provides otherwise, within five days thereafter, the provider shall give notice to the administrator describing the remedial action taken or to be taken.

If an individual terminates an agreement or it becomes reasonably apparent to a provider that a plan has failed, the provider shall promptly refund to the individual all money paid by or on behalf of the individual that has not been paid to creditors, less fees that are payable to the provider under section 5-19-223.

Before relocating a trust account from one bank to another, a provider shall inform the administrator of the name, business address, and telephone number of the new bank. As soon as practicable, the provider shall inform the administrator of the account number of the trust account at the new bank.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1157, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-222 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-223. Fees and other charges.

A provider may not impose directly or indirectly a fee or other charge on an individual or receive money from or on behalf of an individual for debt-management services except as permitted by this section.

A provider may not impose charges or receive payment for debt-management services until the provider and the individual have signed an agreement that complies with sections 5-19-219 and 5-19-228.

If an individual assents to an agreement, a provider may not impose a fee or other charge for educational or counseling services, or the like, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (c) and section 5-19-228 (d). The administrator may authorize a provider to charge a fee based on the nature and extent of the educational or counseling services furnished by the provider.

The following rules apply:

If an individual assents to a plan that contemplates that creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or delinquency, the provider may charge:

A fee not exceeding fifty dollars for consultation, obtaining a credit report, and setting up an account; and

A monthly service fee, not to exceed ten dollars times the number of creditors remaining in a plan at the time the fee is assessed, but not more than fifty dollars in any month.

If an individual assents to a plan that contemplates that creditors or debt collectors will settle debts for less than the principal amount of the debt:

(A) A provider may not request or receive payment of any fee or consideration until and unless:

The provider has settled the terms of at least one debt pursuant to a settlement agreement or other valid contractual agreement executed by the individual;

The individual has made at least one payment pursuant to that settlement agreement or other valid contractual agreement between the individual and the creditor or debt collector; and

The fee or consideration either: Bears the same proportional relationship to the total fee for settling the terms of the entire debt balance as the individual debt amount bears to the entire debt amount, in which case the individual debt amount and the entire debt amount are those owed at the time the debt was enrolled in the service; or is a percentage of the amount saved as a result of the settlement. The percentage charged cannot change from one individual debt to another. The amount saved is the difference between the amount owed at the time the debt was enrolled in the plan and the amount actually paid to satisfy the debt.

(B) Notwithstanding subsection (d)(2)(A) of this section, no individual who completes all of his or her obligations under the agreement may be charged fees such that those fees, when added to the aggregate of offers of settlement obtained by the provider for the debtor, exceeds the principal amount of the debt.

A provider may not impose or receive fees under both subsection (d)(1) and (d)(2) of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in section 5-19-228 (d), if an individual does not assent to an agreement, a provider may receive for educational and counseling services it provides to the individual a fee not exceeding one hundred dollars or, with the approval of the administrator, a larger fee. The administrator may approve a fee larger than one hundred dollars if the nature and extent of the educational and counseling services warrant the larger fee.

If, before the expiration of ninety days after the completion or termination of educational or counseling services, an individual assents to an agreement, the provider shall refund to the individual any fee paid pursuant to subsection (d)(4) of this section.

If a payment to a provider by an individual under this part 2 is dishonored, a provider may impose a reasonable charge on the individual, not to exceed the lesser of twenty-five dollars and the amount permitted by law other than this part 2.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1158, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-223 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-224. Voluntary contributions.

A provider may not solicit a voluntary contribution from an individual or an affiliate of the individual for any service provided to the individual. A provider may accept voluntary contributions from an individual but, until thirty days after completion or termination of a plan, the aggregate amount of money received from or on behalf of the individual may not exceed the total amount the provider may charge the individual under section 5-19-223.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1160, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-224 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-225. Voidable agreements.

If a provider imposes a fee or other charge or receives money or other payments not authorized by section 5-19-223 or 5-19-224, the individual may void the agreement and recover as provided in section 5-19-235.

If a provider is not registered as required by this part 2 when an individual assents to an agreement, the agreement is voidable by the individual.

If an individual voids an agreement under subsection (b) of this section, the provider does not have a claim against the individual for breach of contract or for restitution.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1160, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-225 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-226. Termination of agreements.

If an individual who has entered into an agreement fails for sixty days to make payments required by the agreement, a provider may terminate the agreement.

If a provider or an individual terminates an agreement, the provider shall immediately return to the individual any money of the individual held in trust for the benefit of the individual.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1160, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-226 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-227. Periodic reports - retention of records.

A provider shall provide the accounting required by subsection (b) of this section:

Upon cancellation or termination of an agreement; and

Before cancellation or termination of any agreement:

At least once each month; and

Within five business days after a request by an individual, but the provider need not comply with more than one request from an individual in any calendar month.

The amount of the debt when the creditor agreed to the settlement; and

The calculation of a settlement fee.

The amounts deducted from the amount received from the individual;

The amount held in reserve; and

If, since the last report, a creditor has agreed to accept as payment in full an amount less than the principal amount of the debt owed by the individual:

(A) The total amount and terms of the settlement;

(B) The amount of the debt when the individual assented to the plan;

A provider, in a record, shall provide each individual for whom it has established a plan an accounting of the following information:

(1) The amount of money received from the individual since the last report;

(2) The amounts and dates of disbursement made on the individual's behalf, or by the individual upon the direction of the provider, since the last report to each creditor listed in the plan;

A provider shall maintain records for each individual for whom it provides debt-management services for five years after the final payment made by the individual and produce a copy of them to the individual within a reasonable time after a request for them. The provider may use electronic or other means of storage of the records.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1161, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-227 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-228. Prohibited acts and practices.

A provider may not, directly or indirectly:

Misappropriate or misapply money held in trust;

Settle a debt on behalf of an individual without the individual's agreement to the settlement terms pursuant to a settlement agreement or other valid contractual agreement executed by the individual;

Exercise or attempt to exercise a power of attorney after an individual has terminated an agreement;

Initiate a transfer from an individual's account at a bank or with another person unless the transfer is:

A return of money to the individual; or

Before termination of an agreement, properly authorized by the agreement and this part 2, and for:

Payment to one or more creditors pursuant to a plan; or

Payment of a fee;

Offer a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation to an individual for executing an agreement;

Offer, pay, or give a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation to a person for referring a prospective customer, except for a sales lead, if the person making the referral has a financial interest in the outcome of debt-management services provided to the customer, unless neither the provider nor the person making the referral communicates to the prospective customer the identity of the source of the referral;

Receive a bonus, commission, or other benefit for referring an individual to a person;

Structure a plan in a manner that would result in a negative amortization of any of an individual's debts, unless a creditor that is owed a negatively amortizing debt agrees to refund or waive the finance charge upon payment of the principal amount of the debt;

Compensate its employees on the basis of a formula that incorporates the number of individuals the employee induces to enter into agreements;

Settle a debt or lead an individual to believe that a payment to a creditor is in settlement of a debt to the creditor unless, at the time of settlement, the individual receives a certification by the creditor that the payment is in full settlement of the debt;

Make a representation that:

The provider will furnish money to pay bills or prevent attachments;

Payment of a certain amount will permit satisfaction of a certain amount or range of indebtedness; or

Participation in a plan will or may prevent litigation, collection activity, garnishment, attachment, repossession, foreclosure, eviction, or loss of employment;

Misrepresent that it is authorized or competent to furnish legal advice or perform legal services;

Represent that it is a not-for-profit entity unless it is organized and properly operating as a not-for-profit under the law of the state in which it was formed or that it is a tax-exempt entity unless it has received certification of tax-exempt status from the federal internal revenue service; except that, if the provider represents that it is a not-for-profit entity and the provider does not have tax-exempt status under section 501 (c) (3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, the provider shall state, in a clear and conspicuous manner and in close proximity to the representation: "We are not an educational, charitable, or religious organization granted tax-exempt status by the Internal Revenue Service."

Take a confession of judgment or power of attorney to confess judgment against an individual;

Employ an unfair, unconscionable, or deceptive act or practice, including the knowing omission of any material information; or

Advise, encourage, or suggest to the individual not to make a payment to creditors under the plan.

If a provider furnishes debt-management services to an individual, the provider may not, directly or indirectly:

(1) Purchase a debt or obligation of the individual;

(2) Receive from or on behalf of the individual:

(A) A promissory note or other negotiable instrument other than a check or a demand draft; or

(B) A post-dated check or demand draft;

(3) Lend money or provide credit to the individual, except as a deferral of a settlement fee at no additional expense to the individual;

(4) Obtain a mortgage or other security interest from any person in connection with the services provided to the individual;

(5) Except as permitted by federal law, disclose the identity or identifying information of the individual or the identity of the individual's creditors, except to:

(A) The administrator, upon proper demand;

(B) A creditor of the individual, to the extent necessary to secure the cooperation of the creditor in a plan; or

(C) The extent necessary to administer the plan;

(6) Except as otherwise provided in section 5-19-223 (d)(2), provide the individual less than the full benefit of a compromise of a debt arranged by the provider;

(7) Charge the individual for or provide credit or other insurance, coupons for goods or services, membership in a club, access to computers or the internet, or any other matter not directly related to debt-management services or educational services concerning personal finance; or

(8) Furnish legal advice or perform legal services, unless the person furnishing that advice to or performing those services for the individual is licensed to practice law.

This part 2 does not authorize any person to engage in the practice of law.

A provider may not receive a gift or bonus, premium, reward, or other compensation, directly or indirectly, for advising, arranging, or assisting an individual in connection with obtaining an extension of credit or other service from a lender or service provider, except for educational or counseling services required in connection with a government-sponsored program.

Unless a person supplies goods, services, or facilities generally and supplies them to the provider at a cost no greater than the cost the person generally charges to others, a provider may not purchase goods, services, or facilities from the person if an employee or a person that the provider should reasonably know is an affiliate of the provider:

(1) Owns more than ten percent of the person; or

(2) Is an employee or affiliate of the person.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1161, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-228 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-229. Notice of litigation.

No later than thirty days after a provider has been served with notice of a civil action for violation of this part 2 by or on behalf of an individual who resides in this state at either the time of an agreement or the time the notice is served, the provider shall notify the administrator in a record that it has been sued.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1164, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-229 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-230. Advertising.

A provider that advertises debt-management services shall disclose, in an easily comprehensible manner, the information specified in section 5-19-217 (d)(3) and (d)(4).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1164, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-230 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-231. Liability for the conduct of other persons.

If a provider delegates any of its duties or obligations under an agreement or this part 2 to another person, including an independent contractor, the provider is liable for conduct of the person that, if done by the provider, would violate the agreement or this part 2.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1164, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-231 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-232. Powers of administrator - rules.

The administrator may act on its own initiative or in response to complaints and may receive complaints, take action to obtain voluntary compliance with this part 2, and seek or provide remedies as provided in this part 2.

The administrator may investigate and examine, in this state or elsewhere, by subpoena or otherwise, the activities, books, accounts, and records of a person that provides or offers to provide debt-management services, or a person to which a provider has delegated its obligations under an agreement or this part 2, to determine compliance with this part 2. Information that identifies individuals who have agreements with the provider shall not be disclosed to the public. In connection with the investigation, the administrator may:

Charge the person the reasonable expenses necessarily incurred to conduct the examination;

Require or permit a person to file a statement under oath as to all the facts and circumstances of a matter to be investigated; and

Seek a court order authorizing seizure from a bank at which the person maintains a trust account required by section 5-19-222, any or all money, books, records, accounts, and other property of the provider that is in the control of the bank and relates to individuals who reside in this state.

The administrator may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this part 2 in accordance with section 24-4-103.

The administrator may enter into cooperative arrangements with any other federal or state agency having authority over providers and may exchange with any of those agencies information about a provider, including information obtained during an examination of the provider.

The administrator, by rule, shall establish reasonable fees to be paid by providers for the expense of administering this part 2. The fees may vary by the type of debt-management service provided.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1165, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-232 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-233. Administrative and legal remedies.

The administrator may enforce this part 2 and rules adopted under this part 2 by taking one or more of the following actions:

Ordering a provider or a director, employee, or other agent of a provider to cease and desist from any violations;

Ordering a provider or a person that has caused a violation to correct the violation, including making restitution of money or property to a person aggrieved by a violation;

Imposing on a provider or a person that has caused a violation a civil penalty not exceeding ten thousand dollars for each violation;

Prosecuting a civil action to:

Enforce an order; or

Obtain restitution, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars per violation, an injunction, or other equitable relief;

Intervening in an action brought under section 5-19-235.

If a person violates or knowingly authorizes, directs, or aids in the violation of a final order issued under subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2) of this section, the administrator or court may impose a civil penalty not exceeding twenty thousand dollars for each violation.

The administrator may maintain an action to enforce this part 2 in any county.

The administrator may recover the reasonable costs of enforcing this part 2 under subsections (a) to (c) of this section, including attorney fees based on the hours reasonably expended and the hourly rates for attorneys of comparable experience in the community.

In determining the amount of a civil penalty to impose under subsection (a) or (b) of this section, the administrator or the court shall consider the seriousness of the violation, the good faith of the violator, any previous violations by the violator, the deleterious effect of the violation on the public, the net worth of the violator, and any other factor the administrator or the court considers relevant to the determination of the civil penalty.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1165, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-233 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-234. Suspension, revocation, or nonrenewal of registration - definitions.

In this section, "insolvent" means:

Having generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of business other than as a result of good-faith dispute;

Being unable to pay debts as they become due; or

Being insolvent within the meaning of the federal bankruptcy law, 11 U.S.C. sec. 101 et seq., as amended.

The provider or an employee or affiliate of the provider has refused to permit the administrator to make an examination authorized by this part 2, failed to comply with section 5-19-232 (b)(2) within fifteen days after request, or made a material misrepresentation or omission in complying with section 5-19-232 (b)(2); or

The provider has not responded within a reasonable time and in an appropriate manner to communications from the administrator.

In addition to the remedies otherwise available under this part 2, the administrator may suspend, revoke, or deny renewal of a provider's registration if:

(1) A fact or condition exists that, if it had existed when the registrant applied for registration as a provider, would have been a reason for denying registration;

(2) The provider has committed a material violation of this part 2 or a rule or order of the administrator under this part 2;

(3) The provider is insolvent;

If a provider does not comply with section 5-19-222 (f) or if the administrator otherwise finds that the public health, safety, or general welfare requires emergency action, the administrator may order a summary suspension of the provider's registration, effective on the date specified in the order.

If the administrator suspends, revokes, or denies renewal of the registration of a provider, the administrator may seek a court order authorizing seizure of any or all of the money in a trust account required by section 5-19-222, books, records, accounts, and other property of the provider that are located in this state.

If the administrator suspends or revokes a provider's registration, the provider may appeal and request a hearing pursuant to section 24-4-105.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1166, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-234 as it existed prior to 2017.